Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 12. Construction of Act, Saving Clause, Severability

§ 4480.
Construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not affect any act done, contract executed, or liability incurred prior to its effective date, or affect any suit or prosecution pending or to be instituted, to enforce any right, rule, regulation, or ordinance or to punish any offense against any such repealed laws or against any ordinance enacted under them. All ordinances, resolutions, regulations, and rules made under any act of the General Assembly repealed by this chapter shall continue in effect as if such act had not been repealed, except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 109.

§ 4481.
Saving clause.

The amendment of this chapter and the repeal of prior enabling laws relating to zoning ordinances, subdivision regulations, or bylaws or any ordinance or regulation similar to a bylaw authorized by this chapter shall not invalidate any zoning ordinance, subdivision regulation, or bylaw or any such ordinance or regulation enacted under those prior enabling laws, except as follows. Effective September 1, 2005, the provisions of sections 4412 and 4413 of this title, and the provisions of subchapters 9, 10, and 11 of this chapter and the related definitions in section 4303 of this title, shall control over any inconsistent municipal regulations, ordinances, or bylaws. With respect to other provisions of this chapter, any previously enacted zoning ordinance, subdivision regulation, bylaw, or such similar ordinance or regulation shall be amended to conform with the provisions of this chapter by September 1, 2011.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 109.

§ 4482.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and for this purpose, the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 109.

§ 4483.
Construction; limitation.

In reviewing the procedures used in the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any plan or bylaw, no court shall invalidate the plan or bylaw or its amendment or repeal because of a failure to adhere to strict and literal requirements of this chapter concerning minor or nonessential particulars. The court shall uphold the plan, bylaw, or action if there has been substantial compliance with the procedural requirements of this chapter.

No person shall challenge for purported procedural defects the validity of any plan or bylaw as adopted, amended, or repealed under this chapter after two years following the day on which it would have taken effect if no defect had occurred.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 109.

§§ 4490-4496.
Repealed. 2003, No. 115 (Adj. Sess.), § 119(c).